Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-803
Wireless carrier; provide call location
information.

Upon
request of any law enforcement agency, a wireless carrier shall provide call
location information concerning the wireless communication device of a user
as soon as practicable following receipt of the request to facilitate the
response to a call for emergency services or in an emergency situation that
involves the risk or threat of death or serious physical harm.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 3.